Washington statutes.
RCW 35.39.080

City retirement system—Investment advisory committee.

The retirement board of any city which is responsible for the management of an employees' retirement system established to provide retirement benefits for nonpublic safety employees shall appoint an investment advisory committee consisting of at least three members who are considered experienced and qualified in the field of investments.

[ 1982 c 166 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 166: See note following RCW 35.39.060.